zh-CN: 商品状况: 流通品; 优秀（EX）; 超优秀 (EX-MT); 中等 (F); 黑金品 (GM); 良好（G）; 分级; 全新 (M); 近全新 (NM); 近完美全新 (NM); 差 (P); 崭新 (P); 未流通; 非常好（VG）; 非常好-优秀 (VG-EX); 其他
sk-SK: Podmienka: Obehový; Excellent (EX); Excellent-mint (EX-MT); Fair (F); Gem Mint (GM); Good (G); Známkovaný; Mint (M); Near mint (NM); Near mint-mint (NM-MT); Poor (P); Pristine (P); Nebola v obehu; Very good (VG); Very good-excellent (VG-EX); Iné
ko: 상태: 유통된 상품; 최상급(EX); 최상급-민트(EX-MT); 상급(F); 완벽-민트(GM); 중급(G); 등급이 매겨진; 민트(M); 민트급(NM); 민트급-민트(NM-MT); 하급 (P); 구매 시 상태(P); 유통되지 않은 상품; 중상급(VG); 중상-최상급(VG-EX); 기타
pl: Stan: W obiegu; Doskonały (EX); Doskonały-idealny (EX-MT); Dostateczny (F); Perfekcyjny-idealny (GM); Dobry (G); Oceniony; Idealny (M); Prawie idealny (NM); Prawie idealny-idealny (NM-MT); Słaby (P); Nieskazitelny (P); Nie był w obiegu; Bardzo dobry (VG); Bardzo dobry-doskonały (VG-EX); Inne
fr: État: Diffusé; Excellent (EX); Excellent-menthe (EX-MT); Moyen; Neuf gemme (GM); Bien (G); Noté; Neuf; Proche de l'état neuf (NM); Quasi neuf (NM-MT); Mauvais (P); Parfait (P); Hors-circulation; Très bien (VG); Très bon-excellent (VG-EX); Autre
es: Estado: Circulado; Excelente (EX); Excelente-Impecable (EX-MT); Regular (F); Perfectas condiciones (GM); Bueno (G); Calificado; Impecable (M); Casi perfecto (NM); Casi perfecto-perfecto (NM-MT); Pobre (P); Prístino (P); Sin circular; Muy bueno (VG); Muy Bueno-Excelente (VG-EX); Otros
nl: Staat: Gecirculeerd; Uitstekend (EX); Excellent-nieuwstaat (EX-MT); Redelijk (F); Gem nieuwstaat (GM); Goed (G); Beoordeeld; Nieuwstaat (M); Bijna nieuwstaat (NM); Bijna nieuwstaat-nieuwstaat (NM-MT); Slecht (P); Authentiek (P); Niet gecirculeerd; Zeer goed (VG); Zeer goed-uitstekend (VG-EX); Andere
nb: Betingelse: Sirkulert; Utmerket (EX); Utmerket-strøken (EX-MT); God (F); Strøken tilstand (GM); Bra (G); Gradert; Strøken (M); Nesten strøken (NM); Nesten strøken-strøken; Dårlig (P); Uberørt (P); Usirkulert; Veldig god (VG); Veldig god-utmerket (VG-EX); Annet
vi: Điều kiện: Đã lưu hành; Xuất sắc (EX); Xuất sắc – Hoàn hảo (EX-MT); Khá (F); Hoàn hảo tuyệt đối (GM); Tốt (G); Đã xếp loại; Hoàn hảo (M); Gần như hoàn hảo (NM); Gần như hoàn hảo – Hoàn hảo (NM-MT); Tệ (P); Như mới (P); Chưa lưu hành; Rất tốt (VG); Rất tốt – Xuất sắc (VG-EX); Khác
sl-SI: Stanje: V obtoku; Odlično (EX); Odlično-v popolnem stanju (EX-MT); V redu(F); Izjemno-v popolnem stanju (GM); Dobro (G); Ocenjeno; V popolnem stanju (M); Skoraj v popolnem stanju z minimalnimi nepravilnostmi (NM); Skoraj v popolnem stanju z manjšimi nepravilnostmi (NM-MT); Slabo (P); Nedotaknjeno (P); V popolnem stanju; Zelo dobro (VG); Zelo dobro-odlično (VG-EX); Drugo
bg-BG: Състояние: В обращение; Отличен (EX); Отличен-идеален (EX-MT); Задоволителен (F); Перфектен (GM); Добър (G); Класифициран; Идеален (M); Почти идеален (NM); Почти идеален-идеален (NM-MT); Лош (P); Безупречен (P); Извън обращение; Много добър (VG); Много добър-отличен (VG-EX); Други
ru: Состояние: Использовалось; Отлично (EX); Отличное состояние (EX-MT); Удовлетворительно (F); Новое (GM); Хорошо (G); Оценено; Практически новое (M); Почти как новое (NM); Почти как новое / новое (NM-MT); Плохое (P); Безупречное (P); Не использовалось; Очень хорошо (VG); Очень хорошо / отлично (VG-EX); Другое
da: Tilstand: Cirkuleret; Excellent (EX); Excellent-mint (EX-MT); Fair (F); Gem mint (GM); Good (G); Bedømt; Mint (M); Near mint (NM); Near mint-mint (NM-MT); Poor (P); Pristine (P); Ucirkuleret; Very good (VG); Very good-excellent (VG-EX); Andet
fi: Kunto: Kierrätetty; Excellent (EX); Excellent-mint (EX-MT); Fair (F); Gem mint (GM); Good (G); Arvosteltu; Mint (M); Near mint (NM); Near mint-mint (NM-MT); Poor (P); Pristine (P); Levittämätön; Very good (VG); Very good-excellent (VG-EX); Muu
zh-TW: 狀況: 流通; Excellent (EX); Excellent-mint (EX-MT); Fair (F); Gem mint (GM); Good (G); 分級; Mint (M); Near mint (NM); Near mint-mint (NM-MT); Poor（P）; Pristine (P); 未流通; Very good (VG); Very good-excellent (VG-EX); 其他
en: Condition: Circulated; Excellent (EX); Excellent-mint (EX-MT); Fair (F); Gem mint (GM); Good (G); Graded; Mint (M); Near mint (NM); Near mint-mint (NM-MT); Poor (P); Pristine (P); Uncirculated; Very good (VG); Very good-excellent (VG-EX); Other
ja: 状態: 流通品; エクセレント (EX); エクセレント-ミント (EX-MT); フェア (F); ジェムミント (GM); グッド (G); 評価済み; ミント (M); ニアミント (NM); ニアミント-ミント (NM-MT); プアー (P); プリスティン (P); 未流通品; ベリーグッド (VG); ベリーグッド-エクセレント (VG-EX); その他
it: Condizione: Circolato; Eccellente (EX); Eccellente-nuovo (EX-MT); Discreto (F); Gem mint (GM); Buono (G); Classificato; Mint (M); Quasi pari al nuovo (NM); Quasi nuovo (NM-MT); Scarso (P); Immacolato (P); Non circolato; Molto buono (VG); Molto buono-eccellente (VG-EX); Altro
hr-HR: Stanje: Circulated; Excellent (EX); Excellent-mint (EX-MT); Fair (F); Gem mint (GM); Good (G); Graded; Mint (M); Near mint (NM); Near mint-mint (NM-MT); Poor (P); Pristine (P); Uncirculated; Very good (VG); Very good-excellent (VG-EX); Ostalo
cs: Stav: Circulated; Excellent (EX); Excellent-mint (EX-MT); Fair (F); Gem mint (GM); Good (G); Graded; Mint (M); Near mint (NM); Near mint-mint (NM-MT); Poor (P); Pristine (P); Uncirculated; Very good (VG); Very good-excellent (VG-EX); Jiné
lt-LT: Būklė: Iš apyvartos; Nepriekaištinga (EX); Puiki (EX-MT); Vidutinė (F); Be priekaištų (GM); Gera (G); Įvertinta; Be defektų (M); Be defektų (NM); Beveik be defektų - be defektų (NM-MT); Prasta (P); Tobula (P); Nebuvusi apyvartoje; Labai gera (VG); Labai gera - puiki (VG-EX); Kita
pt-PT: Estado: Em circulação; Excelente (EX); Muito excelente (EX-MT); Justo (F); Perfeitas condições (GM); Bom (G); Classificado; Perfeito (M); Quase perfeito (NM); Mesmo quase perfeito (NM-MT); Pobre (P); Intocado (P); Sem circulação; Muito bom (VG); Muito bom-excelente (VG-EX); Outro
tr: Durum: Dolaşımlı; Mükemmel (EX); Mükemmel - iyi durumda (EX-MT); Orta (F); Az miktarda iyi durumda (GM); İyi (G); Kademeli; İyi durumda (M); Neredeyse iyi durumda (NM); Neredeyse iyi durumda - iyi durumda (NM-MT); Kötü (P); Bozulmamış (P); Dolaşımsız; Çok iyi (VG); Çok iyi - mükemmel (VG-EX); Diğer
pt-BR: Estado: Circulado; Excelente (EX); Pequenas imperfeições (EX-MT); Algumas imperfeições (F); Quase nenhuma imperfeição (GM); Bom (G); Classificação; Muito bom (M); Algumas mínimas imperfeições (NM); Algumas pequenas imperfeições (NM-MT); Ruim (P); Excelente (P); Não circulado; Muito bom (VG); Muito bom-excelente (VG-EX); Outro
hu: Állapot: Forgalmazott; Excellent (EX) – kissé használt; Excellent-mint (EX-MT) – kiváló, apró hibákkal; Fair (F) – megfelelő; Gem mint (GM) – teljesen új; Good (G) – jó; Osztályozott; Mint (M) – tökéletes; Near mint (NM) – tökéletes, nem látható apró hibával; Near mint-mint (NM-MT) – tökéletes, csak egy kis hibával; Poor (P) – gyenge; Pristine (P) – eredeti állapot; Nem forgalmazott; Very good (VG) – nagyon jó; Very good-excellent (VG-EX) – nagyon jó–kiváló; Egyéb
de: Zustand: Im Umlauf; Ausgezeichnet; Ausgezeichnet-Makellos; Mittelmäßig; Einwandfrei; Gut; Benotet; Makellos; Beinahe makellos; Beinahe makellos-makellos; Schlecht; Tadellos; Nicht im Umlauf; Sehr gut; Sehr gut-ausgezeichnet; Sonstiges
el: Κατάσταση: Κυκλοφορημένο; Excellent (EX); Excellent-mint (EX-MT); Fair (F); Gem mint (GM); Καλή (G); Διαβαθμισμένη; Mint (M); Near mint (NM); Near mint-mint (NM-MT); Κακή (P); Άψογη (P); Ακυκλοφόρητο; Πολύ καλή (VG); Πολύ καλή-άριστη (VG-EX); Άλλο
sv: Skick: Cirkulerade; Utmärkt (EX); Excellent-mint (EX-MT); Rättvis; Gem mynta (GM); Bra (G); Betygsatt; Nyskick (mint/M); Nästan nyskick (near mint/NM); Nästan nyskick (near mint/NM); Dålig (poor/P); Orörd (pristine/P); Ocirkulerad; Mycket bra (VG); Mycket bra-utmärkt (VG-EX); Övrigt
th: สภาพสินค้า: ส่งต่อ; สภาพดีเยี่ยม (EX); สภาพดีเยี่ยม-เหมือนใหม่ (EX-MT); สภาพพอใช้ (F); สภาพใหม่เอี่ยม (GM); สภาพดี (G); จัดเกรดแล้ว; สภาพเหมือนใหม่ (M); สภาพเกือบเหมือนใหม่ (NM); สภาพเกือบเหมือนใหม่-เหมือนใหม่ (NM-MT); สภาพแย่ (P); สภาพเดิม (P); ไม่ผ่านการส่งต่อ; สภาพดีมาก (VG); สภาพดีมาก-ดีเยี่ยม (VG-EX); อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Stare: Circulat; Excelent (EX); Excellent-mint (EX-MT); Fair (F); Gem mint (GM); Good (G); Evaluat; Mint (M); Near mint (NM); Near mint-mint (NM-MT); Poor (P); Pristine (P); Necirculat; Very good (VG); Very good-excellent (VG-EX); Altele